District of Columbia statutes.
20-405

Supervised administration; interim orders; distribution and closing orders.

Unless otherwise ordered by the Court, supervised administration is terminated by order in accordance with the provisions of section 20-1301 . Interim orders granting other relief may be issued by the Court at any time during the pendency of a supervised administration on the application of the personal representative or any interested person.

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(t), 42 DCR 63
1981 Ed., § 20-405.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-401.